Washington statutes.
RCW 1.60.050

Hazardous professions excluded.

The state medal of valor will not be awarded to any individual who is acting as a result of service given by any branch of law enforcement, firefighting, rescue, or other hazardous profession where the individual is employed by a government entity within the state of Washington.

[ 2000 c 224 s 5.]